Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-175
Exclusion of lands; notice; form; contents.

The secretary of the board of directors shall cause a notice of the filing of such petition to be published for at least two weeks in some newspaper published in the county where the office of the board of directors is situated, and if any portion of such territory to be excluded lies within another county or counties, then the notice shall be so published in a newspaper published within each of such counties, or if no newspaper is published therein, then by posting such notice for the same time in at least three public places in the district, and in case of the posting of the notices, one of such notices must be posted on the lands proposed to be excluded. The notice shall state the filing of such petition, the names of the petitioners, description of the lands mentioned in such petition, and the prayer of the petition, and it shall notify all persons interested in, or that may be affected by such change of the boundaries of the district, to appear at the office of the board at a time named in the notice, and show cause in writing, if any they have, why the change in the boundaries of such district, as proposed in such petition, should not be made. The time to be specified in the notice at which they shall be required to show cause shall be at the regular meeting of the board next after the expiration of the time for the publication of the notice.

Laws 1895, c. 70, § 48, p. 297;

R.S.1913, § 3505;

C.S.1922, § 2905;

C.S.1929, § 46-150;

R.S.1943, § 46-175.